Massachusetts, session 194th, H2529.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 6A of the General Laws shall be amended by inserting the 
following new section:- 
Section 16CC. The Executive Office of Health and Human Services shall establish and 
provide administrative oversight to the Equitable Approaches to Public Health grant program to 
increase the availability of non-law-enforcement, unarmed community-based response options 
for emergency calls. 
Said grant program shall -- 
(i) make competitive grants to eligible applicants to develop local systems for protecting 
the mental and physical well-being of residents, preventing violence, de-escalating volatile 
situations, ensuring access to human services, and reducing government use of force, in 
emergency and non-emergency situations that do not necessitate the presence of law enforcement 

of 9 12 personnel, or, where appropriate, the person requesting help requests a response from an 
alternative to law enforcement and; 
(ii) produce timely evaluation of grant performance to clarify and assess the outcomes 
and costs of funded programs, and any trends across service models provided through the grant 
program overall; provided further that outcomes assessed shall include, though need not be 
limited to, mental, physical, and behavioral health outcomes, impact on reduced demand for law 
enforcement response to 911 calls, and rate of successfully connecting residents with human 
services for which they present a need. 
Grant making criteria and decisions shall be made by a board of community-based 
stakeholders, one of whom shall be the executive director of the Massachusetts Chapter of the 
National Association of Social Workers or a designee, one of whom shall be the secretary of the 
Department of Mental Health or a designee, one of whom shall be the director of Greater Boston 
Association of Black Social Workers or a designee, one of whom shall be the director of the 
Massachusetts Peer Support Network or a designee, one of whom shall be the director of the 
Western Massachusetts Learning Community or designee, one of whom shall be a consumer of 
services of the Louis D. Brown Peace Institute, one of whom shall be a consumer of services of 
the Massachusetts Office of Addiction and Recovery, and one of whom shall be the director of 
Jane Doe Inc. or a designee. 
SECTION 2. To be eligible to receive a grant under this act, an entity shall be a 
partnership of— 
1.(a) a unit of local government, or its contractor or tribal organization, acting through an 
entity that is independent of any law enforcement agency; and 

of 9 34  (b) a covered community-based organization. The term Community-Based Organization 
shall mean — A nonprofit community-based organization, a consortium of nonprofit 
community-based organizations, or a national nonprofit organization acting as an intermediary 
for a community-based organization. 
2. if applicable, a nonprofit or public institution of higher education, community mental 
health center, or behavioral health organization local to the community. 
SECTION 3. To be eligible to receive a grant under this Act for a project, a partnership 
shall submit an application, to the Executive Office of Health and Human Services at such time, 
in such manner, and containing such information as the Executive Office of Health and Human 
Services may require, including— 
(1) information that specifies in detail— 
(A) the covered populations that the partnership will target for services under this Act; 
(B) the experience of the members of the partnership in successfully working in the 
community to be served and partnering with the target populations. 
(C) how the grant funds will be used; 
(D) the expertise of the partnership, including its staff, in implementing the project to 
provide the proposed services; 
(E) how the partnership will implement or develop evidence-informed best practices in 
carrying out the project, including references to applicable research; and 

of 9 53  (F) the partnership’s plan for gathering regular feedback from service recipients about the 
quality of the services, including contacts and resources, provided through the project; and 
(2) a memorandum of understanding that— 
(A) identifies each partner, including each agency of the unit of local government or 
tribal organization, as applicable, involved, and is signed by a representative of each partner in 
the partnership carrying out the project; and 
(B) outlines— 
(i) the partnership’s engagement with the community, including members of the covered 
population, and the role the engagement played in developing the project; 
(ii) the financial and programmatic commitment of each partner, and the specific role of a 
law enforcement agency, if involved in a backup role; 
(iii) the responsibilities of partners, emergency dispatch operators, and dispatchers in the 
national 911 system, in properly identifying calls in the community to be served necessitating a 
community-based emergency and non-emergency response and directing those calls to 
appropriate responders; 
(iv) the responsibilities of information and referral systems for essential community 
services, accessed in most localities by dialing 211, and the National Suicide Prevention Hotline 
for participating in efficiently routing direct callers to services; 
(v) the responsibilities of each partner with respect to data collection and evaluation; 

of 9 72  (vi) as of the date of submission of the application, how each partner’s existing vision, 
theory of change, theory of action, and activities align with those of the grant program set forth 
in this Act; 
(viii) how the eligible partners’ governing boards or advisory boards, and emergency 
responders, are representative of the community to be served; 
(ix) how a structure through which residents of the community and grassroots 
organizations will have an active role in the eligible partnership’s decision-making; 
(x) how the partnership anticipates that the project involved will decrease the presence of 
local law enforcement in situations not warranting an emergency response; 
(xi) any State or local laws that may be an impediment to implementation of the project; 
and 
(xii) any other information the Executive Office of Health and Human Services 
reasonably determines to be necessary. 
SECTION 4. An eligible partnership that receives a grant under this Act for a project may 
use the grant funds for— 
(1) project planning and community engagement; 
(2) project implementation; 
(3) staffing and recruitment; 
(4) facilities; 

of 9 91  (5) operational costs, including costs of startup or expansion activities, marketing, 
language translation and interpretation, and transportation; 
(6) engagement with technical assistance providers; 
(7) consulting services; 
(8) training; 
(9) program and project evaluation, including evaluation of program and project efficacy, 
staff performance, and service delivery; 
(10) programming and service interventions that include— 
(A) activities that prioritize human service interventions, by entities other than law 
100 enforcement; or 
101  (B) activities that include triaging emergencies, through emergency dispatch operators, in 
102 a manner that results in referral to entities other than law enforcement; and 
103  (11) activities that include follow-up by human services organizations after contact by 
104 law enforcement, such as peer support or community mediation, social services, or behavioral 
105 health services; 
106  (12) training for emergency dispatch operators; and 
107  (13) training for community members, or family members of people requiring emergency 
108 or non-emergency response, to facilitate comprehensive and clear communication with 
109 emergency dispatch operators to ensure that necessary information is conveyed about when an 
110 intervention by a nonpolice human services organization is the most appropriate response. 

of 9 111  SECTION 5. None of the grant funds shall be provided to State, tribal, or local law 
112 enforcement agencies. 
113  SECTION 6. Not later than 4 fiscal quarters after the board begins dispensing grants in 
114 accordance with this subsection, the Commonwealth shall enter into a contract with an 
115 independent entity or organization – whose governing board or senior staff is comprised all or in 
116 part of community members who i) live in communities that experience a disproportionate police 
117 presence or that are disproportionately impacted by the criminal justice system or (ii) were 
118 formerly incarcerated to conduct an evaluation for the purposes of— 
119  (a) determining the effect of the provision of such services on— 
120  (I) emergency room visits; 
121  (II) use of ambulatory services; 
122  (III) hospitalizations; 
123  (IV) the involvement of law enforcement in mental health or substance use disorder crisis 
124 events; 
125  i). Including but not limited to: 
126  a.Data to be made available by the Department of Public Health pertaining to law 
127 enforcement-related injury or death 
128  b.Data to be made available by the entity responsible for the identification and 
129 dispatching of 911 or emergency services relative to a covered population’s needs 

of 9 130  (VI) other relevant outcomes identified by the Executive Office of Health and Human 
131 Services 
132  SECTION 7. Each recipient of a grant for a project under this section is required to 
133 submit an annual report to the Executive Office of Health and Human Services that details— 
134  (1) the specific uses of the grant funds; 
135  (2) the number of individuals contacted through the project; 
136  (3) the number of individuals connected with ongoing services or resources through the 
137 project, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability 
138 status, religious affiliations, and other characteristics; 
139  (4) any evidence of positive outcomes following the contacts or connections; 
140  (5) any evidence of negative outcomes that may have occurred following the contacts or 
141 connections; 
142  (6) the percentage of total emergency calls diverted from law enforcement to the grant 
143 recipient; 
144  (7) the percentage of emergency calls diverted to the grant recipient that have been 
145 addressed; 
146  (8) the extent to which the grant recipient is hiring or training individuals from within the 
147 covered population, and the recruitment, hiring, training, and retention practices for such 
148 individuals; 

of 9 149  (9) any related reduction in the number of calls to law enforcement over the period of the 
150 project; 
151  (10) any changes in the types of calls made to the 911 system, to the extent that it is 
152 practicable to report information on such changes; 
153  (11) any increases in the number of calls to the 211 (or equivalent) systems for essential 
154 non-emergency community services or calls to the 988 National Suicide Prevention Hotline over 
155 the period of the project; 
156  (12) any State or local laws that were an impediment to implementation of the project; 
157 and 
158  (13) any evidence of completed in-home, teletherapy, or in-community responses that 
159 included counseling, crisis response, family treatment, mediation, or other evidence-based 
160 interventions that addressed complex needs not able to be resolved by non-emergency calls 
161 alone. 
162  SECTION 8. Not later than October 1, 2028, the Executive Office of Health and Human 
163 Services shall— 
164  (1) complete an evaluation detailing the implementation of, outcomes of, and best 
165 practices from the grant program carried out under this Act, including program-wide information 
166 on the factors described in paragraphs (2) through (13) of section 6; and 
167  (2) submit to the legislature a report containing the evaluation and recommended next 
168 steps for the program.